Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Chapter 13. Automated Data Match System for Identifying and Seizing Financial Assets of Obligors Identified by Department of Revenue

§ 85-13-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Revenue of the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Revenue.

“Finally determined tax liabilities” means any state tax, fee, penalty, and/or interest owed by a person to the department where the assessment of the liability is not subject to any further timely filed administrative or judicial review.

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company, estate, trust, association, joint venture, other legal entity or other group or combination acting as a unit, and includes the plural as well as the singular in number.

“Financial institution” means a bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association or credit union authorized to do business and accept deposits in this state under state or federal law.

“Account” means any money held in the name of an account owner, individually or jointly with another, including, but not limited to, a deposit account, demand account, savings account, negotiable order of withdrawal account, share account, member account, time certificate of deposit, or money market account. “Account” shall not include money held by a financial institution where the obligor is listed in a capacity other than the owner, including, but not limited to, an authorized signer only, custodian, payable on death beneficiary or agent.

“Obligor” means any person against whom a tax judgment for a finally determined tax liability has been enrolled in the Uniform State Tax Lien Registry for which collection of the tax debt is enforceable as provided by law.

“Levy” means a Distress Warrant for the Levy Of Monies Owed To Taxpayer(s) which is an instrument of the commissioner that binds monies held by the garnishee and owed to the obligor.

“Identifying information” means an obligor’s social security number or federal tax identification number.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 407, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 85-13-3.
Commissioner to develop, maintain and operate automated data match system; purpose; procedure; review of information to determine if department should serve levy to financial institution.

The commissioner shall develop, maintain and operate an automated data match system for the purpose of identifying and seizing the financial assets of obligors as identified by the department.

The commissioner may provide financial institutions a quarterly, electronic inquiry file containing names and identifying information of obligors. Within thirty (30) days of receipt of the inquiry file, the financial institution agreeing to use the data match system shall match the file against its own records for the purpose of identifying whether an account for an obligor is held by the financial institution and notify the department of its findings. When a match is identified, the financial institution shall provide the department the names and identifying numbers on record for the accounts, account numbers, and the account balances as of the date of response back to the department.

A financial institution may request an extension of time to file the information required. Extensions of time are not automatically granted and the reporting institution must demonstrate good cause for requesting the extension. An extension of time for filing the required information may be granted if the request for extension is filed with the commissioner by the date on which the reports are due.

Upon receiving the information from the financial institution and pursuant to the provisions of Section 27-3-33, the commissioner shall review such account information to determine if the department should serve a levy to the financial institution. The levy shall be served either by mail or by delivery by an agent of the commissioner. Not more than twenty-five (25) levies per day shall be served on a financial institution that participated in the data match system. The levy shall require the financial institution to encumber or surrender assets held by the institution on behalf of the obligor. For a financial institution participating in the data match program, the answer shall be made at any time within thirty (30) days after the service of the levy in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. Any amount encumbered and forwarded by the financial institution under this chapter shall not exceed the amount of the warrant.

The financial institution agreeing to use the data match system shall be held to account for only the funds on deposit between the time of service of the levy and the time of its answer, and shall have no obligation to account for additional deposits accruing after the time of its answer to the department. The financial institution may serve its answer within a reasonable time not to exceed thirty (30) days and shall not be held to account for any indebtedness that arises subsequent to service of its answer or property that may come into its hands subsequent to the service of the levy.

The commissioner may develop and provide a system wherein the levy may be delivered and responded to electronically by a financial institution, and the response may include, but shall not require, the electronic transfer of funds.

The commissioner shall adopt a regulation establishing the procedures and requirements for conducting automated data matches with financial institutions pursuant to this chapter as soon as practicable after July 1, 2017.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 407, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 85-13-5.
Financial institution’s use of certain existing data match systems; immunity from liability; disclosure of certain information; violation by financial institution or employee.

If a financial institution has a current data match system used in compliance with the child support data match system provided for in Section 43-19-48, the financial institution may use that system to comply with the provisions of this chapter. The department shall not require a financial institution to change the file format established with the Department of Human Services in order to comply with this chapter.

A financial institution, including its directors, officers, employees, attorneys, accountants or other agents, is immune from any liability under any law or regulation to any person for the disclosure of information pursuant to this chapter and for the encumbrance, seizure, or surrender of any assets held by the financial institution in response to a levy issued by the department. A financial institution is not liable for any action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this section.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a financial institution furnishing a report or providing information to the commissioner is prohibited from disclosing to a depositor or an account holder that the name of the person has been received from or furnished to the commissioner; however, financial institutions may, but are not required to, disclose to their depositors or account holders that the department has the authority to request and receive certain identifying information provided for under this chapter for state tax collection purposes. Financial institutions may, but are not required to, notify a depositor of account holder of the receipt of a levy and imposition of a hold on the depositor’s or holder’s account.

An authorized agent transmitting data electronically on behalf of financial institutions is subject to the same terms, conditions, and confidentiality provisions that apply to such institutions, as set forth in this chapter.

If a financial institution or any employee of the financial institution willfully violates the provisions of this chapter, the financial institution is liable for the lesser of the amount in the account of the depositor or account holder on the date of submittal of the answer by the financial institution or the dollar amount listed on the levy.

A financial institution may not disclose any information contained in a request for information by the commissioner except to authorized employees, agents or attorneys of the financial institution engaged in complying with the reporting requirements of this chapter or to authorized employees of the department. Employees of the financial institution may use the information only as required in performing their duties and may not otherwise copy, reproduce, retain, or store any information except as instructed in writing by the commissioner. Any electronic media files or other information acquired by the financial institutions from the commissioner will remain the property of the department and must be returned to the commissioner at the time the information reports are due, or at any other time designated by the commissioner.

The department and the financial institution shall not be liable for any applicable early withdrawal penalties and/or any nonsufficient funds (NSF) fees on the obligor’s account(s).

Notwithstanding any other law or rule to the contrary, the financial institution participating in the data match system may recover the costs associated with responding to a levy served upon it from the account of the depositor, per contractual agreement, and shall deduct this amount from the account of the depositor prior to transfer to the department.

To support a data match, the department may disclose certain information relating to taxpayers against whom the department has filed a lien. The information includes the name and address of the taxpayer, the amount of the lien, and the person’s identification numbers, including the social security number and/or the Employers Identification Number (EIN).

The department may use the information received from a financial institution under this chapter only for the purpose of enforcing the collection of taxes, fees, penalties and/or interest administered by the department. The department shall keep all information received from the financial institutions pursuant to this chapter confidential, and any employee, agent, or representative of the department is prohibited from disclosing that information to any other third party.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 407, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2017.